lv_LV/hyph_lv_LV.dic
UTF-8
d4z
d4ю
a2i
a2u
i2e
e2i
u2i
i2u
o2i
o2u
e2u
.vi1s2a.
.vi1s2в.
.vi1s2i.
.vi1s2os.
.vi1s2u.
.vi1s2iem.
o1pо
ы1rз
i1ta
ы1ga
з1юu
ы1to
в1ni
i1rз
i1иo
в1bu
o1mо
o1kв
o1иi
в1lo
e1иы
o1пв
e1la
i1рo
o1bi
з1cз
в1ru
o1si
u1no
e1hв
в1nз
e1bы
i1ru
o1sы
a1иa
в1иa
o1rз
i1ke
o1ra
u1te
i1zo
i1gi
з1ma
ы1нe
ы1ca
o1dз
a1nв
в1ge
e1иi
ы1bз
з1tв
в1fi
i1zi
o1lо
e1рe
e1gв
i1fo
a1тo
u1to
о1zз
ы1gu
в1рa
i1нi
ы1nз
о1ma
в1te
з1kз
ы1mв
u1zu
o1sв
з1bu
о1ga
e1di
о1te
a1по
e1tз
i1юe
o1fo
в1pu
o1hu
з1do
o1du
в1ma
ы1mi
e1re
i1ha
i1be
e1lu
в1ja
ы1ta
a1ры
a1da
з1cо
i1bu
a1pо
u1тв
e1zu
ы1no
e1nо
i1no
e1mв
з1пa
ы1pв
в1be
в1mo
о1ja
e1ji
о1re
e1ce
о1ri
о1tо
ы1ni
о1юо
i1юi
a1fо
a1be
e1рв
e1нo
e1pы
e1по
u1мi
з1tо
a1ci
e1jз
a1zо
o1lз
u1ga
о1ci
a1ke
e1ho
i1nы
ы1ро
e1si
e1bo
o1мз
u1тi
u1sз
з1bв
o1рa
ы1ro
з1ce
i1zо
i1ve
o1пu
i1dо
o1ku
e1vз
a1ri
u1sв
i1pв
i1dз
o1pы
о1vо
a1me
з1ze
о1bз
u1нe
a1bз
a1ja
в1пo
a1jз
e1fe
o1pu
o1to
з1vз
a1ki
o1mв
o1lo
a1lo
з1нi
e1рз
ы1dо
ы1cв
o1zo
o1gы
o1gв
о1tз
e1zз
о1le
e1gо
о1na
o1me
e1po
e1fu
a1мe
u1rы
u1ri
ы1jo
e1dз
a1пa
a1юв
о1пa
з1ne
a1zы
в1vз
e1so
o1mi
o1рo
з1sо
з1пu
e1ga
i1pз
e1vu
o1ru
з1ju
u1иi
в1va
a1hu
о1sз
e1нa
i1rв
a1ив
о1ki
i1ti
u1cu
i1юu
в1jo
u1ki
u1mu
o1но
e1ma
о1пo
з1de
o1иo
в1иu
i1тa
u1пa
u1mв
o1he
i1lо
a1de
o1fa
з1ro
o1sо
в1ri
ы1ti
o1bз
a1jв
ы1zu
в1vо
e1пe
o1тa
о1de
о1рe
a1kы
ы1ja
o1dо
e1юi
e1ri
о1gв
e1ki
u1ze
u1ma
i1vо
з1pо
u1lu
e1ti
o1ив
a1нi
ы1zз
a1пo
i1иi
o1ke
a1мu
i1vз
u1иu
u1ca
u1vu
o1пa
i1ri
o1тo
u1co
a1rв
o1jв
о1bi
e1ио
з1rз
e1kв
i1pi
a1ka
в1vu
ы1юa
e1mо
e1vо
o1gi
a1pз
ы1zв
i1cз
e1va
o1nо
о1ru
e1pв
a1ce
з1kв
o1ja
a1hз
a1bo
ы1mu
о1ve
i1nв
i1fi
o1va
u1юu
e1мi
з1nо
i1li
i1тo
u1la
о1мe
e1ca
a1tв
ы1zi
a1bы
з1pз
о1su
о1pв
о1zu
ы1di
e1lo
в1mв
e1ci
a1юa
з1to
e1rы
в1la
u1нu
o1мо
в1pa
e1lы
e1sо
e1bз
i1co
i1нз
a1рo
ы1ku
u1рв
o1di
a1тa
о1pa
o1pi
a1юз
a1si
a1ha
u1рo
з1mв
о1mo
в1юo
ы1lu
e1юы
o1нi
в1vв
a1юo
i1zв
a1ku
o1zi
o1dв
e1cu
о1no
e1zi
e1jы
в1тo
i1ce
ы1lз
a1юо
o1mз
i1bо
o1re
e1zы
ы1ra
a1gi
i1lз
о1bв
ы1рu
e1bi
i1gы
ы1нi
з1va
в1to
u1ce
a1pы
в1gi
i1нe
в1kв
e1но
з1юa
u1ve
u1vo
з1no
o1bu
a1tо
e1fi
e1пo
ы1юi
a1tы
о1ti
о1la
i1ho
з1gi
i1fы
a1tз
в1нi
a1mi
e1ra
u1ja
e1me
о1bu
i1pu
o1la
a1но
u1рu
o1юa
a1rы
ы1пa
e1иu
о1lo
o1nu
в1jз
a1dв
u1rз
u1rо
з1юo
i1mв
a1zo
o1юu
з1da
о1co
ы1zо
в1sa
з1рu
ы1po
i1si
u1zз
ы1ri
u1zо
ы1gв
e1pu
в1du
e1cз
з1ji
i1bi
з1rв
i1пi
u1nu
i1ki
a1mы
о1ni
в1fe
з1ca
в1тi
u1go
a1nu
e1nз
u1ku
в1юi
з1go
e1иe
з1za
в1ив
i1мe
о1go
a1go
e1bо
i1ze
e1ры
o1kз
o1pз
i1na
в1ra
в1jо
o1za
e1zв
a1lв
e1тз
a1je
з1si
в1bo
u1gв
i1sз
u1рi
u1bо
a1vв
e1ko
в1рu
в1мз
i1mo
e1пв
i1tз
u1пв
a1тз
u1na
о1vo
ы1me
a1hо
ы1ka
в1mо
в1lо
ы1tu
e1je
о1vв
a1ba
о1dв
ы1ko
ы1cз
в1nо
a1пз
u1ju
в1юв
ы1mo
i1ge
в1pв
e1lв
i1но
a1sз
e1ni
a1ma
a1tu
i1kы
a1bi
i1jо
о1нu
e1fв
u1ta
з1dз
a1gв
i1lв
i1тi
e1пa
з1ti
в1bi
a1рi
a1lо
i1ja
e1mu
o1hз
u1jв
ы1рa
i1sв
u1po
в1cв
a1se
o1тe
u1fo
в1sы
в1bы
o1co
o1нз
в1пa
e1юe
u1tо
о1ku
u1нa
u1zi
e1do
i1so
o1fi
з1sв
i1pо
о1рi
a1dо
в1ti
u1тo
u1pa
o1ka
o1cо
i1pe
о1mв
в1pз
в1pо
ы1pз
o1bы
e1нз
a1mз
в1rы
o1de
i1нa
o1ро
о1gu
u1bi
в1ka
в1nu
u1юi
u1so
з1ka
в1le
з1pe
u1по
о1me
u1dо
i1юв
i1du
з1ra
o1vo
o1fв
o1so
в1пв
e1dв
в1gu
o1bo
e1hо
в1мi
в1иo
a1dз
u1di
о1se
з1sз
в1nв
a1nо
ы1rв
o1hi
o1рв
i1lы
з1lз
i1te
u1рe
о1tu
u1мo
e1рi
ы1ba
e1тa
u1si
з1zo
ы1kв
i1gu
ы1da
i1sы
o1bо
a1mo
з1gв
в1ve
u1bз
e1тo
з1vo
о1mо
u1пu
в1tu
i1cо
u1fa
в1tв
з1gu
o1ga
i1mi
i1fз
i1пe
в1co
u1юо
i1zз
i1vu
a1ju
i1ca
о1иu
ы1re
з1bi
e1ro
i1fв
a1he
u1mo
i1jo
e1bu
о1ro
a1te
о1мi
в1di
i1bы
u1пi
u1le
a1na
e1tв
e1bв
o1tы
ы1ze
в1fu
о1be
a1pв
u1de
i1dы
e1ve
о1di
a1vo
u1lв
e1pi
u1dз
з1dв
o1jo
i1юo
о1нe
o1nв
e1mы
в1zв
a1ro
о1rв
a1юe
u1je
a1ti
ы1cо
i1tо
о1vi
о1jo
e1co
i1tы
i1bo
ы1pe
e1tы
o1pв
з1se
a1пв
в1ji
a1иo
e1za
в1mз
a1юы
e1рo
о1пu
ы1jв
o1su
e1ja
o1ta
e1lо
o1ze
о1vз
o1vв
a1vо
i1kо
в1zо
u1ha
о1pз
i1de
o1nз
ы1bо
з1tu
a1юi
в1юu
o1тв
o1пo
i1тз
u1ci
о1ca
ы1sa
e1rо
i1bз
e1ne
a1ро
u1gi
о1mu
a1zв
i1lo
о1cз
u1lо
e1иo
a1bu
i1nо
в1dв
в1tз
в1ko
о1рu
o1мi
a1ta
i1la
a1va
a1рe
a1hi
a1ca
e1be
e1юз
a1su
о1dо
o1da
e1мo
e1тu
e1pa
о1jв
e1sв
a1тi
ы1so
о1nu
i1vo
ы1lo
о1nз
з1mо
ы1cu
o1юз
з1jв
о1cв
a1иu
o1zы
a1lu
в1lu
o1тu
a1vu
i1tu
i1нu
i1нo
i1ko
a1fa
о1pi
i1go
i1me
a1fi
e1sы
о1ju
o1pe
a1sо
a1nз
ы1юe
з1ve
i1po
o1zз
a1ne
e1sa
a1lз
з1рa
ы1gi
з1lв
i1mы
u1vв
ы1mо
ы1mз
u1ro
в1po
o1ju
i1fu
i1jз
i1ga
ы1tв
з1lu
ы1sв
a1gы
в1bв
a1la
o1ri
з1рo
ы1тa
o1fз
e1li
з1ko
u1va
о1рo
a1zi
e1dо
i1da
i1ро
i1hо
i1ne
i1рu
з1ku
e1тв
o1na
о1юa
o1иa
в1fa
o1tз
о1dз
o1tв
i1hi
з1mu
о1so
e1cв
в1zi
о1cо
u1рз
o1no
в1тe
u1bu
ы1gз
o1ve
a1мо
i1lu
i1pa
e1ka
в1ci
u1но
o1sa
o1go
i1nu
о1юo
i1sо
o1fо
a1pu
a1du
о1пi
o1ba
i1fa
e1mi
o1cu
u1юa
в1mi
a1нв
i1иu
o1юы
о1kв
в1нe
u1мз
e1da
з1dо
о1иo
ы1pa
в1de
o1ma
i1dв
з1тo
ы1юu
o1ko
a1vз
в1zз
в1sв
о1do
u1cв
о1пв
u1du
e1ju
в1si
o1vз
i1рa
u1fe
o1ji
з1re
ы1по
u1тa
в1ca
a1рu
ы1nu
ы1le
e1нi
в1tо
o1ge
i1vв
ы1za
з1nв
ы1ma
в1нu
e1lз
в1sз
в1li
о1ne
i1mо
в1pi
a1mв
a1юu
i1ju
з1vu
u1nв
ы1ru
e1vi
a1pa
i1bв
o1cз
в1lз
e1ku
u1lз
i1se
e1vв
з1jз
e1pо
з1ci
o1рi
a1hв
a1kв
u1ji
ы1rо
о1sв
i1ro
o1rв
ы1ki
o1ro
e1ru
o1kы
з1su
a1тв
ы1tо
в1ba
e1тe
e1nu
з1te
в1vo
a1sa
e1nы
ы1юо
o1юe
ы1do
з1jо
о1vu
o1vi
u1ba
в1na
о1mз
a1ji
u1ti
e1mo
a1ra
e1hi
o1te
u1bo
e1su
i1fо
з1pi
i1мi
о1тu
ы1lо
в1ro
o1zв
a1vi
o1ni
о1za
o1do
о1zв
o1gз
u1zы
u1li
u1da
a1иi
e1ta
i1ra
в1нa
a1jы
о1ba
a1cз
u1ra
i1kв
i1zu
з1nu
a1рв
e1to
u1gз
ы1pо
a1ho
в1je
о1нa
a1ve
o1рu
u1иo
о1mi
u1sо
a1dы
e1cы
о1rо
u1ko
в1но
в1zu
в1mu
о1sa
в1тu
u1ka
i1ba
ы1vi
з1ga
з1мe
a1rо
u1рa
u1cо
a1co
о1cu
o1vu
i1je
u1do
o1cв
в1vi
i1jв
a1ze
a1mu
o1тi
e1юa
o1ио
i1иa
i1mз
в1cо
з1la
e1dы
ы1nо
о1po
з1пi
о1nв
ы1be
u1se
ы1ci
о1тв
о1ke
в1cз
з1sa
з1li
a1мв
u1pe
в1ku
a1bо
u1pu
o1ca
u1ne
о1по
u1mi
e1du
i1пu
u1pв
о1тa
о1pu
u1be
o1иu
o1рз
ы1рo
з1me
a1нa
u1zo
з1zв
ы1ce
e1tо
o1нu
з1jo
u1tы
в1cu
i1vi
e1юв
a1jo
e1jo
ы1bi
u1nо
в1пu
e1zo
i1ma
u1vз
o1jы
o1ha
ы1pu
e1рa
a1ru
a1li
u1mо
ы1ve
в1pe
i1cu
ы1nв
о1sо
e1pe
о1zо
i1rо
о1pe
o1po
в1rз
a1тe
о1gi
e1юо
о1lu
i1su
о1tв
a1no
о1юi
a1sы
a1ko
i1юз
u1jo
i1va
о1ji
a1fe
o1pa
e1rз
e1ро
з1cu
i1рв
ы1юв
e1мe
з1cв
a1po
i1tв
в1ne
о1va
e1se
о1ra
o1gu
ы1de
u1dв
i1di
u1rв
з1nз
a1to
e1fо
a1so
e1ze
з1le
o1mu
о1ta
e1пu
a1zз
з1нз
o1мe
e1na
ы1vз
з1du
u1юo
i1nз
о1si
i1ka
о1fe
e1no
i1le
e1pз
e1мз
в1go
i1ni
e1иa
a1ио
з1be
a1рa
e1gi
i1mu
з1bз
a1иы
о1рв
a1bв
о1du
o1ci
з1bo
в1ki
o1mo
з1lo
o1lв
o1le
a1gо
u1kв
з1vi
о1lз
u1из
з1mo
a1cо
u1иa
о1to
a1fз
u1нi
e1fa
о1рa
o1bв
a1пi
о1da
a1mо
i1gв
a1мз
e1cо
в1ta
i1re
в1me
ы1dз
a1re
о1li
a1ga
o1tu
u1pо
e1ha
в1нз
e1tu
i1мз
e1kз
в1bз
o1иы
a1zu
ы1sз
ы1ne
в1ga
ы1vo
o1ho
з1пв
o1rо
ы1ju
o1fu
ы1ji
o1lы
в1do
i1to
u1bв
u1ge
u1cз
a1le
u1нз
о1ce
a1нu
в1ze
e1рu
з1ja
a1vы
i1тв
з1na
o1ne
в1dз
в1мa
u1su
u1sa
з1di
ы1su
e1fo
з1ni
о1pо
i1ku
з1pa
з1po
о1zi
i1пa
i1рi
з1lо
в1no
a1jо
в1gв
o1zо
в1dо
o1пi
в1rв
з1zi
ы1pi
з1ge
o1mы
i1kз
e1gы
u1gu
i1zы
a1gu
a1lы
i1cв
ы1lв
o1нe
o1se
з1vв
з1ru
a1fo
e1sз
в1re
в1lв
e1пi
a1тu
e1jв
в1юa
з1zu
e1тi
u1pi
з1mз
o1тз
o1ti
u1pз
e1zо
u1fi
e1нe
в1jв
u1vо
о1тi
u1юв
ы1li
e1de
o1be
з1zо
e1hu
e1he
о1lв
u1tз
e1nв
a1sв
в1se
з1пo
a1мi
о1ze
o1je
ы1te
e1kы
o1li
в1ce
o1vо
i1ci
в1so
e1ge
i1рe
a1ni
i1do
в1lы
o1юв
o1рe
o1zu
a1cu
e1mз
e1gu
з1ta
a1do
e1ba
з1мi
e1юo
в1gы
a1za
ы1la
ы1но
a1pi
о1nо
ы1рв
i1рз
o1пe
з1mi
u1zв
i1нв
о1ko
o1dы
о1нi
a1нз
в1su
о1lо
e1ив
з1пe
u1za
o1юi
o1fe
ы1tз
o1ki
в1za
e1le
з1bо
a1di
o1sз
о1юu
о1bo
u1me
a1rз
i1пo
ы1si
в1sо
u1ni
о1ka
в1пi
o1tо
в1рo
u1tu
e1юu
i1юa
o1lu
з1rо
в1ju
u1ро
a1нe
з1so
в1da
з1ba
з1ri
o1ce
з1ki
i1пв
a1pe
o1ры
u1пo
о1zo
з1rы
e1go
e1te
i1za
e1vo
u1vi
i1fe
i1тu
в1zo
з1zз
o1jз
u1re
в1тa
з1pв
o1юo
u1nз
u1тu
ы1du
a1пu
u1mз
з1pu
u1lo
i1ji
в1rо
о1rз
e1rв
u1ru
a1cв
o1rы
ы1na
u1мe
ы1dв
u1tв
i1sa
at1tu
eg1rы
ak1so
it1de
eb1lв
et1vо
or1bi
al1рa
ap1dы
ak1na
um1ci
aр1le
зr1нe
en1ku
il1ki
зr1ku
at1nв
at1мз
us1pз
os1vо
os1ci
an1ra
en1pa
ej1dз
aю1vо
as1bu
оs1ga
iт1di
en1to
uj1me
or1ki
el1zo
ot1nз
es1ko
uz1gu
ak1ti
оr1ni
iz1hi
il1pu
es1ma
вt1vi
ag1rз
on1zз
оb1tu
ap1do
оt1vо
ul1sв
оk1lо
ur1so
ok1tз
зb1tu
оs1la
et1ve
al1mo
op1рa
en1ce
im1nо
uр1нa
ek1ti
iz1cо
er1di
ur1fa
an1tв
er1ba
as1pe
al1su
ip1so
al1cо
at1de
aт1ra
зk1рu
оg1li
om1ni
oт1ka
as1le
at1тi
id1rо
un1ve
al1kы
in1da
вr1ba
оs1юu
al1ka
up1jо
ur1gu
at1sо
оg1mв
вl1ti
al1va
uп1ku
ok1rз
er1gi
uz1пo
ak1рз
оm1re
iz1te
вt1vз
зg1ni
оg1ru
il1cз
ir1mu
ar1ku
ot1zi
ub1na
an1иe
om1bо
зg1si
el1le
av1ru
il1nu
зs1te
ur1kв
ik1ro
ep1nu
ur1vз
oт1lu
it1ma
il1ja
зj1tз
an1ga
eр1pa
вl1ce
ob1rо
ur1vi
up1ri
зz1tв
iz1иo
ap1рa
uz1ru
ut1rз
ar1to
eю1nо
aр1пu
aп1ce
al1ne
is1sо
ib1рo
uz1nu
ut1тu
ul1de
вr1ho
am1pы
зl1gu
um1vi
ik1to
зr1ze
oю1va
ez1nо
am1lо
ak1se
el1ko
ep1si
вj1tu
um1zв
at1ja
al1но
az1dв
or1to
ec1he
at1cо
en1ko
ыs1ki
оg1sa
ef1ri
вr1sa
im1po
оt1rо
ed1vi
id1sз
в1dюв
up1la
зc1te
es1pu
uk1рo
вp1ni
в1dюi
ak1la
en1na
as1ka
вm1di
ag1li
og1rв
ag1dв
oz1vi
an1ku
оk1nз
us1mы
er1ma
вb1рa
in1tu
ob1ti
ap1cu
es1vв
ac1ti
ur1pu
ar1kо
el1la
it1ta
am1le
ik1se
зk1ti
ar1sa
is1mu
ut1нe
вr1vо
u1dюi
et1nв
id1ka
вl1se
ur1na
вr1zo
uz1li
вn1ka
as1ve
ab1la
aт1нe
зb1tв
el1vв
al1юu
at1pы
at1go
зr1la
e1dzi
iz1dз
ab1se
at1юз
ir1ca
зr1su
uп1ma
el1pe
ej1ve
ap1ve
оg1rв
el1po
ed1lo
it1mo
ep1nв
uk1tu
at1рo
ap1рв
вr1иo
ak1sз
ek1tз
om1pe
ul1go
um1dо
ec1si
зd1vi
um1mв
iz1mo
ok1zв
вp1ro
вl1ko
вl1vз
ed1po
оl1zi
of1rз
зj1lo
ap1sы
ip1рo
is1pu
in1fe
ep1ra
at1рa
or1ga
on1gв
ak1рu
at1jo
es1pa
uz1рa
вr1su
uz1be
ik1sо
en1рa
ok1te
ok1bu
ur1рa
or1мe
оn1ta
ap1мi
iz1zu
im1tо
ap1te
on1nв
us1jы
ur1no
ab1ti
en1jы
op1so
eт1no
ur1ka
an1рo
ol1le
ыs1mo
вs1tв
ek1tо
uz1sо
iр1нв
um1pв
is1po
ob1lз
ap1za
ek1do
ez1mз
зd1la
uр1ka
of1ri
en1hо
вf1ri
uk1nu
iz1do
ej1ga
ul1ri
iz1fi
ir1na
is1ka
вr1do
en1рo
oю1ma
зs1tо
at1sв
um1la
oр1pa
eb1to
ez1тi
ej1ka
iv1юu
uт1мu
ik1na
il1ko
ol1mu
im1si
ap1ta
os1tu
us1tо
at1ko
ar1ci
iп1do
un1иi
oр1si
en1zв
ir1zo
i1dюв
uz1ba
er1vз
ip1ni
il1zu
in1pы
or1hi
iv1de
os1mз
uz1pы
вm1pi
os1tы
az1bз
al1de
on1de
uz1ce
em1ba
зr1пu
at1nз
вr1tы
ur1cu
ir1ku
вv1da
оp1ri
op1rв
ej1ni
am1dо
ak1va
ek1pi
up1ve
ыt1ma
un1tв
aр1ma
вv1ja
um1ti
ыz1mв
im1te
ev1rз
on1ti
ig1za
iz1gы
up1rв
id1pы
вr1cо
вr1lо
el1lз
us1ga
ez1da
ap1cз
ej1la
ag1da
uz1va
op1sз
вм1ve
el1to
зz1kы
eр1vi
uz1vо
о1dze
is1mз
ef1rо
ab1рa
up1ma
вr1nо
aр1va
ab1ri
ob1tв
ik1sв
is1mо
ag1рa
ыr1ka
вт1mu
ev1ni
or1da
em1ze
вj1lo
at1rы
al1re
il1cо
вr1mi
et1ma
um1da
ob1le
вp1tu
el1pв
iz1нe
ez1tu
al1tо
ap1rы
iz1ta
em1юa
ar1gi
зv1re
as1kв
aю1kв
eg1ta
al1gв
ap1le
ap1ro
оv1ni
op1ka
ik1vi
il1tо
ur1pо
ir1kо
iт1ne
iz1da
op1re
зl1ni
is1nu
ar1cз
ed1sз
ul1ka
вs1ma
op1ba
os1fз
ak1le
eп1mы
зb1рu
aр1ra
uп1pu
oн1vв
вr1рo
am1di
вr1юu
ed1pu
ed1ve
en1re
ыk1li
uр1pi
ep1ta
al1ve
ad1ma
ez1ce
зg1tв
ud1rо
im1bi
ek1ra
iv1jы
ez1bi
iz1me
uп1tо
if1rз
ap1ku
id1ni
og1rз
зj1de
op1ko
iz1tо
un1ci
оt1ka
зj1nо
зr1pз
oр1пa
at1zu
оv1ga
os1na
og1ga
es1lu
вt1ko
az1va
em1zi
as1ke
an1si
iz1mi
er1vв
ep1sз
al1sв
us1cы
ul1sa
en1ta
or1vз
ek1tв
uz1юo
an1ma
i1dzо
ij1ku
id1la
зp1ta
зп1ko
ur1ti
ap1nо
ot1re
eр1тu
un1de
вr1vз
uz1мо
er1mы
o1dюu
oр1ni
ij1kв
al1lo
ig1lo
er1rо
em1pu
ug1пo
ыр1do
ip1рa
ыs1tв
oр1ba
al1lз
eр1da
uп1пв
вr1sы
in1de
em1to
вs1tu
ol1fi
or1mв
iv1pu
aр1la
ec1ho
вr1za
ar1ka
ub1sо
ap1zi
зp1to
вk1tu
er1te
ur1zu
оm1ka
on1ju
ap1go
us1lo
or1na
og1no
am1dв
вr1ta
зl1ne
er1cв
im1na
uz1zв
вr1no
aj1ci
ip1tв
it1пu
ag1ri
вr1bы
os1po
зт1da
an1kы
om1bз
вr1ve
aп1мe
im1ti
al1ti
от1ni
in1na
ep1la
uz1di
iю1me
al1tз
in1si
ed1ma
or1tu
em1ta
ug1si
er1be
us1ra
il1mu
вr1ga
eb1lo
оr1rы
оt1re
al1la
et1vi
el1di
вr1юi
iz1ca
ad1da
зn1mо
ut1sa
ol1po
ez1ra
ir1рв
eg1рo
ud1pu
ud1lз
uk1sз
on1vu
em1pв
зk1bз
вr1dз
en1zы
вj1re
at1lo
ez1ni
et1ka
iv1ji
in1ku
or1bо
ok1ti
al1si
ur1zо
ыn1ga
зr1pa
am1bi
at1ro
зr1bu
iz1нз
ip1sз
uz1иi
ir1du
uh1tв
er1bв
ik1ga
ор1нi
iz1rы
it1da
ok1тu
зg1ta
ir1lo
an1ka
in1dо
es1vо
op1ma
um1sо
on1pa
em1pо
ыk1ko
el1tо
uz1me
er1vо
ыz1na
eg1ru
it1ga
us1du
оt1тu
ep1lв
ur1va
um1zо
оd1lо
o1dюi
вr1bu
ak1tв
er1ta
зr1no
зr1pв
um1bi
en1ca
oт1cы
зj1mu
at1pо
зr1gв
ip1re
вr1vi
aп1нo
et1ni
ir1gы
вp1ne
ir1su
вt1me
eb1tu
in1cз
aр1нe
ip1ro
om1da
ep1tо
ef1ra
ы1dza
зt1ku
ub1li
az1be
ыs1ka
us1pa
ar1su
uf1li
ыr1vо
оs1za
af1rз
uz1тa
e1dюa
iz1bз
ыt1di
en1nо
eп1нз
es1ku
az1da
оg1ra
iz1gв
ar1но
er1рu
ud1ka
ed1ri
op1ra
ap1li
ap1dо
ed1la
an1rо
en1tо
вb1рo
an1cы
зj1da
es1tо
er1ko
ыg1ta
el1zu
in1ne
er1bi
ig1me
eю1ni
ad1mi
aj1ni
el1li
ik1рu
вl1pu
ar1ga
et1ta
оc1рe
uz1zu
om1bы
un1ku
оb1ni
ar1юa
зt1ni
is1tu
un1ze
aр1di
it1ni
en1zз
